Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 11

Dower And Curtesy

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

28-11-101. Definition.

As used in this chapter, “endowed” means invested and shall apply both to dower and curtesy.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 3514; Pope's Dig., § 4396; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-201.

28-11-102. Descent of land upon death of spouse having dower or curtesy interest.

At the death of any surviving spouse who has dower or curtesy for life in land, the property shall descend in accordance with the will of the first deceased spouse or, if the first spouse died intestate, then to descend in accordance with the law for the distribution of intestates' estates.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 22; C. & M. Dig., § 3537; Pope's Dig., § 4423; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 39; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-227.

Subchapter 2

— Entitlement Generally

Effective Dates. Acts 1935, No. 84, § 3: approved Feb. 26, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Because certain Federal and State lending agencies are finding it difficult to place a construction on the meaning of Act 315 of 1923 and, therefore, it creating some confusion relative to the usage of this act and, thereby prohibiting numerous citizens from securing loans because of such defects in their titles; this act, therefore, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety; an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

28-11-201. Actions of spouse not to bar right to dower or curtesy.

No act, deed, or conveyance executed or performed by one (1) spouse without the assent of the other spouse, evinced by acknowledgment in the manner required by law, shall pass the estate of dower or curtesy.

No judgment, default, covin, or crime of one (1) spouse shall prejudice the right of the other spouse to curtesy or dower, or preclude either spouse from the recovery thereof, if otherwise entitled thereto.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1939, No. 313, § 2, as amended by Acts 1943, No. 69, § 1, which were repealed by Acts 1981, No. 714, § 41, provided in part that a married woman could freely dispose of any property which she owned in her own name and of her own separate estate without her husband joining in the deed, conveyance, etc., affecting the title to the property. Acts 1943, No. 69, § 2, validated all sales and conveyances made theretofore by any married woman of such property whether or not her husband joined in the conveyance or act of sale.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

J. Cliff McKinney, With All My Worldly Goods I Thee Endow: The Law and Statistics of Dower and Curtesy in Arkansas, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 353 (2016).

The operation of the dower provisions under §§28-11-301,28-11-307, and this section which gave the wife the right of dower which could not be defeated by a husband's conveyance and the comparable curtesy statutes under former §§ 61-228 (repealed) and 61-229 (repealed) which allowed the wife to defeat curtesy by conveyance provided for dissimilar treatment for men and women similarly situated, and since there was no justification for the discrimination, §28-11-307 and this section were held unconstitutional. Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

This section was a gender based statute which did not serve an important governmental function; thus it was held unconstitutional, since it violated the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution. Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372 (1981), overruled in part, Beck v. Merritt, 280 Ark. 331, 657 S.W.2d 549 (1983) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

A spouse has the right to make a will which excludes the surviving spouse or provides for a bequest or devise in lieu of dower; that a surviving spouse may take against a will prevents any injustice that might result from the spouse's exercise of that right. Estate of Dahlmann v. Estate of Dahlmann, 282 Ark. 296, 668 S.W.2d 520 (1984).

The making of a will which excludes the surviving spouse is not an “act” which impermissibly defeats the right of dower under this section. Estate of Dahlmann v. Estate of Dahlmann, 282 Ark. 296, 668 S.W.2d 520 (1984).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 16; C. & M. Dig., § 3529; Pope's Dig., § 4413; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 25; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-208.

28-11-202. Surviving spouse of alien entitled to dower or curtesy.

The surviving spouse of an alien shall be entitled to dower in the estate of the deceased spouse in the same manner as if the alien had been a native-born citizen of this state.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 313, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-231.

Cross References. Aliens' right to receive property, §18-11-101.

28-11-203. Right of dower and curtesy barred.

The inchoate right of dower or curtesy of any spouse in real property in the State of Arkansas is barred in all cases when or where the other spouse has been barred of title or of any interest in the property for seven (7) years or more and also in real property or interest conveyed by the husband or wife but not signed by the other spouse when the conveyance is made or has been made for a period of seven (7) years or more.

This section shall affect the inchoate right of dower and curtesy of a spouse in real property in this state only where or when the husband or wife has been barred of title for seven (7) years or more, or when a conveyance by the husband or wife, without the signature of the other spouse, has been made for a period of seven (7) years or more.

However, this section shall not apply unless the instrument of conveyance by the husband or wife has been of record for at least seven (7) years.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

J. Cliff McKinney, With All My Worldly Goods I Thee Endow: The Law and Statistics of Dower and Curtesy in Arkansas, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 353 (2016).

Since the wife's inchoate right of dower was not a vested right, it was not protected from legislative impairment by guaranties for protection of property or rights of citizens. Skelly Oil Co. v. Murphy, 180 Ark. 1023, 24 S.W.2d 314 (1930) (decision under prior law).

Where husband, pursuant to contract, sold land to which he held legal title and wife refused to release her inchoate right of dower, decree protecting dower rights of wife would be conditioned upon husband predeceasing her within seven years from date of decree. Fletcher v. Felker, 97 F. Supp. 755 (W.D. Ark. 1951).

A mere contract to convey some land, signed only by the husband, does not cause this section to become operative. Smith v. Smith, 268 Ark. 993, 597 S.W.2d 848 (Ct. App. 1980).

This section applies to actions to recover land and does not govern suits to foreclose mortgages. White v. White, 198 Ark. 740, 131 S.W.2d 4 (1939).

Sale of husband's land during his life-time under execution against him did not defeat the claim of his widow, within seven years of his death, to her dower interest therein. Roetzel v. Beal, 196 Ark. 5, 116 S.W.2d 591 (1938).

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (b).

Ark. L. Rev.

Wills — Descent and Distribution — Right of Felonious Killer to Participate in Estate of Person Killed, 7 Ark. L. Rev. 416.

Decedent's Estates: Share of Murderer and His Heirs in Victim's Estate, 24 Ark. L. Rev. 348.

Notes, Estate of Sargent v. Benton State Bank: Judicial Limitations on a Slayer's Right to Inherit from the Decedent, 38 Ark. L. Rev. 653.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

J. Cliff McKinney, With All My Worldly Goods I Thee Endow: The Law and Statistics of Dower and Curtesy in Arkansas, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 353 (2016).

This section was intended to apply only to dower and curtesy and does not apply to a widow's claim for statutory allowance where she is convicted of the murder of her husband. However, apart from this section, the principle that one who wrongfully kills another will not be permitted to share in the other's estate or otherwise profit from the crime will apply to such a situation. Smith v. Dean, 226 Ark. 438, 290 S.W.2d 439 (1956), overruled, Zinger v. Terrell, 336 Ark. 423, 985 S.W.2d 737 (Ark. 1999).

This section was not applicable where the insured and his beneficiary wife were found together dead of gunshot wounds without evidence as to who died first or that the insured had killed his wife and then committed suicide. Belt v. Baser, 238 Ark. 644, 383 S.W.2d 657 (1964).

Where the husband was living with his wife at the time of her death and there is no evidence either that he had anything to do with the death of his wife or that he had abandoned her, a court commits error in holding that the husband forfeited his right of curtesy in his wife's estate. Phipps v. Wilson, 251 Ark. 377, 472 S.W.2d 929 (1971).

Where a wife committed suicide shortly after killing her husband and consequently was not tried or convicted, this section did not exclude her heirs from asserting dower in her husband's property. Barnes v. Cooper, 204 Ark. 118, 161 S.W.2d 8 (1942).

One who wrongfully kills another is not permitted to profit by the crime; the purpose underlying this general rule is to deter such conduct. However, the rule is inapplicable where the wrongdoer stands to gain nothing by his actions, as where he kills himself too. Luecke v. Mercantile Bank, 286 Ark. 304, 691 S.W.2d 843 (1985).

Cited: Belt v. Baser, 238 Ark. 644, 383 S.W.2d 657 (1964); Wright v. Wright, 248 Ark. 105, 449 S.W.2d 952 (1970).

Cross References. Life interests and remainders, determination of present value, §18-2-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1859, No. 231, § 1: effective on passage.

Acts 1891, No. 65, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1945, No. 143, § 4: Mar. 2, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “Due to the fact that a widow's dower has never been defined as provided by this act and many widows are being deprived of their dower rights in the sale of timber, oil, gas or mineral rights, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Averill & Brantley, A Comparison of Arkansas's Current Law Concerning Succession, Wills, and Other Donative Transfers with Article II of the 1990 Uniform Probate Code, 17 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 631.

Ark. L. Rev.

Comment, Arkansas Marriage: A Partnership Between a Husband and Wife, or a Safety Net for Support?, 61 Ark. L. Rev. 735.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

J. Cliff McKinney, With All My Worldly Goods I Thee Endow: The Law and Statistics of Dower and Curtesy in Arkansas, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 353 (2016).

The operation of the dower provisions under subsection (b) of this section, §28-11-201, and §28-11-307 which gave the wife the right of dower which could not be defeated by a husband's conveyance and the comparable curtesy statutes under former §§ 61-228 (repealed) and 61-229 (repealed) which allowed the wife to defeat curtesy by conveyance provided for dissimilar treatment for men and women similarly situated and there was no justification for the discrimination. Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

Subsection (a) of this section which was gender based and did not serve an important governmental function was held unconstitutional as a violation of the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment of the United States Constitution. Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372 (1981), overruled in part, Beck v. Merritt, 280 Ark. 331, 657 S.W.2d 549 (1983); Beck v. Merritt, 280 Ark. 331, 657 S.W.2d 549 (1983) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

Subsection (b) of this section, which gave a wife a dower interest in property which her husband may have disposed of during the marriage without her consent, but did not give the husband equal rights to her property, was a gender based statute which did not serve an important governmental function and thus was unconstitutional since it violated the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment of the United States Constitution. Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372 (1981), overruled in part, Beck v. Merritt, 280 Ark. 331, 657 S.W.2d 549 (1983) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

Where decedent died intestate, widow's claim of dower to a part of his real property under subsection (a) of this section was the exact equivalent of the rights of curtesy under former § 61-228 (repealed), which he could have enjoyed had he survived his wife; hence, there was no impingement of the equal protection clause, as there was no discrimination in favor of either sex where the deceased spouse died intestate. Beck v. Merritt, 280 Ark. 331, 657 S.W.2d 549 (1983) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

The statement, in Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372, 18 A.L.R.4th 903 (1981), that subsection (a) of this section was unconstitutional was too broad and extended beyond the holding reached in Stokes, supra, which was that where a husband died testate the wife could not take dower against the will, there being no concomitant benefit given to husbands under the law the statement should have been qualified by the provisional wording that the statute was unconstitutional “as applied in this case.” Beck v. Merritt, 280 Ark. 331, 657 S.W.2d 549 (1983) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

Dower and curtesy statutes, as they existed prior to 1981 amendments, were valid in cases of intestacy because there was no difference between the dower of a surviving wife and the curtesy of a surviving husband. Dent v. Rose, 281 Ark. 42, 661 S.W.2d 361 (1983) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

A widow may make an equitable transfer of her unassigned dower. Griffin v. Dunn, 79 Ark. 408, 96 S.W. 190 (1906); Beauchamp v. Bertig, 90 Ark. 351, 119 S.W. 75 (1909).

Unassigned dower is not alienable at law. Flowers v. Flowers, 84 Ark. 557, 106 S.W. 949 (1907).

In the absence of divorce, a married woman is entitled to dower, although she has contracted a second and bigamous marriage. Grober v. Clements, 71 Ark. 565, 76 S.W. 555 (1903).

The right to dower is governed by the law of the place where the lands are situated. Apperson v. Bolton, 29 Ark. 418 (1874).

Dower is not barred by a conveyance by the husband. Smith v. Lamb, 87 Ark. 344, 112 S.W. 884 (1908).

Inchoate dower interest held by defendant's wife in non-homestead property did not preclude a finding that defendant could have obtained enough funds from sale of the property to pay legal fees in a criminal case; defendant was therefore required to reimburse the government for legal services provided under the Criminal Justice Act, 18 U.S.C.S. § 3006A.United States v. Fincher, 593 F.3d 702 (8th Cir. 2010).

A divorce from the bond of matrimony bars the wife's right of dower. Wood v. Wood, 59 Ark. 441, 27 S.W. 641 (1894); Kendall v. Crenshaw, 116 Ark. 427, 173 S.W. 393 (1915); Taylor v. Taylor, 153 Ark. 206, 240 S.W. 6 (1922); Moore v. Warren, 160 Ark. 629, 255 S.W. 306 (1923).

Ruling in favor of a corporation that the decedent's wife did not hold title to the land or mineral rights at issue was proper because she possessed only a dower interest at the time of the 1986 deed under subsection (a) of this section and the after-acquired title doctrine barred her from asserting a claim to the property. At most, she had only a dower interest in the oil, gas, and mineral rights reserved by her husband in the 1986 deed and even if the deed had specifically limited her conveyance to her actual interest at the time, that interest was inchoate when the deed was executed.Evans v. SEECO, Inc., 2011 Ark. App. 739 (2011).

Widow's dower in real estate is not to be reduced by federal estate tax. Thompson v. Union & Mercantile Trust Co., 164 Ark. 411, 262 S.W. 324 (1924), superseded by statute as stated in, Terral v. Terral, 212 Ark. 221, 205 S.W.2d 198 (1947).

A widow is not entitled to dower in improvements made by a purchaser from her husband. Welch v. McKenzie, 66 Ark. 251, 50 S.W. 505 (1899).

A widow is not entitled to the value of improvements made upon lands sold without her consent. Welch v. McKenzie, 66 Ark. 251, 50 S.W. 505 (1899).

A widow's dower is not cut off by a probate sale for the payment of debts. Livingston v. Cochran, 33 Ark. 294 (1878).

The probate court cannot order a sale of any part of the lands free of dower. Webb v. Smith, 40 Ark. 17 (1882).

The forfeiture of land for taxes and the sale by the state after the time for redemption expires extinguishes the widow's right to dower. McWhirter v. Roberts, 40 Ark. 283 (1883).

Dower is not barred by a judicial sale, though the widow is a party to the suit, unless her dower was put in issue. Fourche River Lumber Co. v. Walker, 96 Ark. 540, 132 S.W. 451 (1910).

There is no dower in lands held in joint tenancy. Cockrill v. Armstrong, 31 Ark. 580 (1876).

If a trustee has an interest in the trust estate, the wife is entitled to dower if it can be assigned without prejudice to the trust estate. Cockrill v. Armstrong, 31 Ark. 580 (1876).

Where the value of a widow's dower in all of her husband's lots is set apart to her in part of them, she has no claim to dower out of the remainder. Rockafellow v. Peay, 40 Ark. 69 (1882).

A widow is entitled to dower in estate pur autre vie as personalty. Stull v. Graham, 60 Ark. 461, 31 S.W. 46 (1895).

A widow is not entitled to dower in lands held in trust merely. McKneely v. Terry, 61 Ark. 527, 33 S.W. 953 (1896).

An estate in entirety is not subject to dower. Roulston v. Hall, 66 Ark. 305, 50 S.W. 690 (1899).

Land under lease and in tenant's possession at time of landlord's death is subject to widow's dower interest under rules relating to real property and not those relating to personalty. Brack v. Coburn, 210 Ark. 334, 196 S.W.2d 230 (1946).

The widow of a deceased mortgagor is not barred of dower in the mortgaged lands by a decree of foreclosure, though she was a party to the suit, unless her right to dower was put in issue. McWhirter v. Roberts, 40 Ark. 283 (1883).

Where a wife joins her husband in a mortgage on land relinquishing her dower therein, after his death she only has dower interest subject to the mortgage, and has no right to compel the administrator to pay off the mortgage with the personal estate. Hewitt v. Cox, 55 Ark. 225, 15 S.W. 1026 (1891).

A mortgage upon a homestead accepted as security for an antecedent debt of the husband in consideration of which the time is extended for a definite period is valid to convey the wife's dower although the wife was induced to execute it by the misrepresentations of the officer who took her acknowledgment that mortgage did not cover the homestead where the mortgagee had no notice thereof. Hill v. Yarborough, 62 Ark. 320, 35 S.W. 433 (1896).

Dower is not barred by a mortgage in which wife did not join. Lowe v. Walker, 77 Ark. 103, 91 S.W. 22 (1905).

A widow's rights in land are subject to a mortgage existing at the time of her marriage, but an increase of indebtedness secured by the mortgage made after the marriage and in which she does not join would be void as against her. Harris v. Mosley, 195 Ark. 62, 111 S.W.2d 563 (1937).

A widow has dower for life of one-third of the real estate owned by her husband at any time during coverture, whether unsold at his death or sold or alienated by him without her consent in legal form, and one-third of all personal estate owned by him at his death, including money or cash on hand and choses in action, absolutely, unless he leaves no children, in which case her interest is one-half of each part instead of one-third. And this dower in each part she takes by way of a lien, created by and at the time of marriage, and paramount to creditors and purchasers, and without any regard to his debts. Her dower in each part is carved out of the specific estate of which he was possessed; and, if she has been deprived of it, she can follow it wherever it may be found, and subject it to her lien, unless by her own laches, she has abandoned or waived the right. Hill's Adm'rs v. Mitchell, 5 Ark. (5 Pike) 608 (1844).

While dower remains unascertained, and until there has been an actual admeasurement by metes and bounds, it is a mere potential interest, amounting to nothing more than a chose in action, and is not subject to seizure and sale by execution at law. Pennington v. Yell, 11 Ark. 212 (1850).

A widow takes dower under law existing at husband's death. Hatcher v. Buford, 60 Ark. 169, 29 S.W. 641 (1895); Sanders v. Taylor, 193 Ark. 1095, 104 S.W.2d 797 (1937).

Dower must be carved out of specific property. Johnson v. Johnson, 92 Ark. 292, 122 S.W. 656 (1909).

A widow does not hold as heir of her husband her dower interest in his lands. Barton v. Wilson, 116 Ark. 400, 172 S.W. 1032 (Ark. 1915).

The legislature may change or abolish the inchoate right of dower, it being not a vested right. Skelly Oil Co. v. Murphy, 180 Ark. 1023, 24 S.W.2d 314 (1930).

Until her husband's death a wife's right of dower is inchoate, that is, it is contingent upon his death during her lifetime. It is not an interest in her husband's property as may be conveyed by her and may only be relinquished by her to her husband's grantee in the manner and form as provided by statute. Le Croy v. Cook, 211 Ark. 966, 204 S.W.2d 173 (1947).

A widow's dower is not an estate in itself but, when assigned, it becomes a life estate in the lands assigned, prior to which it has attached to nothing, although it is a right vested in the widow. Bradham v. United States, 287 F. Supp. 10 (W.D. Ark. 1968).

Where a wife fails to join in deed conveying an interest in oil and gas under certain land, one-third of the proceeds of the oil drawn therefrom is properly impounded to protect her inchoate right of dower. B.H. & M. Oil Co. v. Graves, 182 Ark. 659, 32 S.W.2d 630 (1930).

A widow is not entitled to dower in partnership property. Drewry v. Montgomery, 28 Ark. 256 (1873); Welch v. McKenzie, 66 Ark. 251, 50 S.W. 505 (1899).

A widow takes dower in the surplus of partnership real estate, after the payment of partnership debts, as in real estate, for life only, and not absolutely as in personalty, unless there is an agreement between the partners for a conversion and sale of the real estate after the partnership affairs are closed, in which event she takes as in personalty. Lenow v. Fones, 48 Ark. 557, 4 S.W. 56 (1887).

When dower is once fixed, it is paramount to the right of creditors and purchasers, and no act of the husband, without his wife's consent, can divest her of it. Tate v. Jay, 31 Ark. 576 (1876).

Trial court's decision reducing a surviving spouses dower interest, received pursuant to the terms of this section and §28-11-305, for certain claims against the estate under §28-53-111 was reversed because the claim for a commission was not a debt that the spouse owed to the estate and the claim based on a note was a contingent claim still subject to unasserted defenses available to the spouse.Stevens v. Heritage Bank, 104 Ark. App. 56, 289 S.W.3d 147 (2008).

A widow is not entitled to dower in the proceeds of land sold by an administrator, but in the specific lands. Tiner v. Christian, 27 Ark. 306 (1871).

Where testator's property at death consists of household goods and land, his will directs the land to be sold and converted into cash, and widow elects to take against the will and consents to the sale of the land, her dower in the realty is limited to a life interest in the proceeds from the sale of the land. Atkinson v. Van Echaute, 236 Ark. 423, 366 S.W.2d 273 (1963).

Where lands redeemed with money of insolvent estate are assigned as dower, a widow must pay her part of sum paid to redeem. Salinger v. Black, 68 Ark. 449, 60 S.W. 229 (1900).

A woman cannot relinquish dower in favor of her husband. Countz v. Markling, 30 Ark. 17 (1875); Pillow v. Wade, 31 Ark. 678 (1877).

An infant married woman cannot release dower. Watson v. Billings, 38 Ark. 278 (1881).

A wife's relinquishment of dower is inoperative when the husband's deed was ineffectual. Smith v. Howell, 53 Ark. 279, 13 S.W. 929 (1890).

A mortgage upon a homestead accepted as security for an antecedent debt of the husband in consideration of which the time was extended for a definite period was valid to convey the wife's dower although the wife was induced to execute it by misrepresentations of the officer who took her acknowledgment that the mortgage did not cover the homestead where the mortgagee had no notice thereof. Hill v. Yarborough, 62 Ark. 320, 35 S.W. 433 (1896).

Statutory mode of relinquishing is exclusive. Bowers v. Hutchinson, 67 Ark. 15, 53 S.W. 399 (1899).

Where a widow, in pursuance of a family agreement, conveys her homestead and dower interests in certain lands of her husband to one of his heirs, she will be held to have abandoned her rights therein. Felton v. Brown, 102 Ark. 658, 145 S.W. 552 (1912).

Sale of husband's land during his life-time, under execution against him, does not defeat the claim of his widow, within seven years of his death, to her dower interest therein. Roetzel v. Beal, 196 Ark. 5, 116 S.W.2d 591 (1938).

Seizen need not be a legal title as an equitable estate is sufficient. Kirby v. Vantrece, 26 Ark. 368 (1870); Tate v. Jay, 31 Ark. 576 (1876); Hewitt v. Cox, 55 Ark. 225, 15 S.W. 1026 (1891); Spalding v. Haley, 101 Ark. 296, 142 S.W. 172 (1911).

Where a husband died intestate and dower was assigned to his widow in certain lands and subsequently upon her remarriage her second husband purchased the reversion in the dower lands and died before the wife, such reversionary interest was not sufficient to give the second husband “seizen” in the land so as to support, after the death of the second husband, the widow's claim to dower in such reversionary interest. McGuire v. Cook, 98 Ark. 118, 135 S.W. 840 (1911).

The husband must have been seized in possession during coverture. McGuire v. Cook, 98 Ark. 118, 135 S.W. 840 (1911).

A tenant's widow cannot claim any dower interest in the land for the reason her husband had no title and was not seized of an estate of inheritance in the land. Kilpatrick v. Kilpatrick, 204 Ark. 452, 162 S.W.2d 897 (1942).

The requirements of seizen are the same under this section as under §28-11-307. Pfaff v. Heizman, 218 Ark. 201, 235 S.W.2d 551, 23 A.L.R.2d 957 (1951).

Cited: United States v. 339.77 Acres of Land, 240 F. Supp. 545 (W.D. Ark. 1965); Owen v. Owen, 267 Ark. 532, 592 S.W.2d 120 (1980); Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981).

History.

Acts 1935, No. 84, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 4414, 8919; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 38; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-226.

28-11-204. Murder of spouse — Effect.

Whenever a spouse shall kill or slay his or her spouse and the killing or slaying would under the law constitute murder, either in the first or second degree, and that spouse shall be convicted of murder for the killing or slaying, in either the first or second degree, the one so convicted shall not be endowed in the real or personal estate of the decedent spouse so killed or slain.

In the event that a decedent spouse under this section dies without a will, the descendents of the one so convicted shall not benefit from the estate of the decedent spouse unless the descendents of the spouse that committed the murder are also descendants of the decedent spouse.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 313, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-230; Acts 2013, No. 1019, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Extent of Interest

28-11-301. Land generally.

If a person dies leaving a surviving spouse and a child or children, the surviving spouse shall be endowed of the third part of all the lands for life whereof his or her spouse was seized, of an estate of inheritance, at any time during the marriage, unless the endowment shall have been relinquished in legal form.

A person shall have a dower or curtesy right in lands sold in the lifetime of his or her spouse without consent of the spouse in legal form against all creditors of the estate.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, §§ 1, 28; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3514, 3543; Pope's Dig., §§ 4396, 4429; Acts 1981, No. 714, §§ 18, 24; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 61-201, 61-207.

Partnership Property.

28-11-302. Lands exchanged — Election.

If a person seized of an estate of inheritance in lands exchanges it for other lands, the surviving spouse shall not have curtesy or dower of both, but shall make an election to curtesy or dower in the lands given or of those taken in exchange. If the election is not evinced by the commencement of proceedings to recover curtesy or dower of the lands given in exchange within one (1) year after the death of the deceased spouse, the surviving spouse shall be deemed to have elected to take the curtesy or dower of the lands received in exchange.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 3516; Pope's Dig., § 4400; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-209.

28-11-303. Mortgaged land.

When a person seized of an estate of inheritance in land shall have executed a mortgage of the estate before marriage, the surviving spouse, nevertheless, shall be entitled to dower or curtesy out of the lands mortgaged as against every person except the mortgagee and those claiming under him or her.

When a person shall purchase lands during coverture and shall mortgage his or her estate in the lands to secure the payment of the purchase money, the surviving spouse shall not be entitled to dower or curtesy out of the lands as against the mortgagee or those claiming under him or her, although he or she shall not have united in the mortgage. However, he or she shall be entitled to dower or curtesy as against all other persons.

When, in such a case, the mortgagee or those claiming under him or her, shall, after the death of the mortgagor, cause the land mortgaged to be sold, either under a power contained in the mortgage or by virtue of the decree of a circuit court and any surplus shall remain after the payment of the moneys due on the mortgage and the costs and charges of sale, then the surviving spouse shall be entitled to the interest or income of one-third (1/3) part of the surplus for life, as his or her curtesy or dower.

A surviving spouse shall not be endowed of lands conveyed to the deceased spouse by way of mortgage unless the deceased spouse has acquired an absolute estate therein during the marriage.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

J. Cliff McKinney, With All My Worldly Goods I Thee Endow: The Law and Statistics of Dower and Curtesy in Arkansas, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 353 (2016).

This section, which gave a widow a dower interest in property which was mortgaged by her husband before the mortgage, but did not give this right to the husband, was gender based and served no important governmental function; thus, it was held unconstitutional since it violated the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution. Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372 (1981), overruled in part, Beck v. Merritt, 280 Ark. 331, 657 S.W.2d 549 (1983) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

A widow's rights in land are subject to mortgage existing at the time of her marriage, but an increase of indebtedness secured by the mortgage made after her marriage and in which she did not join would be void as against her. Harris v. Mosley, 195 Ark. 62, 111 S.W.2d 563 (1937).

Where a surviving husband waited until real estate was sold and debts paid before asserting his curtesy right therein, he waived his curtesy rights in the real estate, but was still entitled to curtesy in the net proceeds of the sale. Quick v. Davidson, 261 Ark. 38, 545 S.W.2d 917 (1977).

Cited: Birnie v. Main, 29 Ark. 591 (1874); Bothe v. Gleason, 126 Ark. 313, 190 S.W. 562 (1916); Corcorren v. Sharum, 141 Ark. 572, 217 S.W. 803 (1920); Owen v. Owen, 267 Ark. 532, 592 S.W.2d 120 (1980); Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Wright, The Arkansas Law of Oil and Gas, 9 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 223.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, §§ 4-7; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3517-3520; Pope's Dig., §§ 4401-4404; Acts 1981, No. 714, §§ 27-30; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 61-210 — 61-213.

28-11-304. Sale of timber, oil, gas, or mineral leases.

If a person dies leaving a surviving spouse and a child or children, the surviving spouse shall be entitled, absolutely and in his or her own right, to one-third (1/3) of all money received from the sale of timber, oil and gas or other mineral leases, oil and gas or other mineral royalty or mineral sales, and to one-third (1/3) of the money derived from any and all royalty run to the credit of the royalty owners from any oil or gas well or to royalty accruing from the production of other mines or minerals in lands in which he or she has a dower, curtesy, or homestead interest, unless the surviving spouse shall have relinquished same in legal form.

(1)All persons, firms, partnerships, or corporations now engaged in the production of oil and gas or other minerals shall immediately withhold payments to the royalty interests until the rights of the surviving spouse are determined, as defined by this section, and shall thereafter pay the surviving spouse separately his or her one-third (1/3) part of all royalty accruing to the royalty interest unless he or she shall have relinquished the royalty interest in legal form.

In the sale of timber, the purchaser shall pay one-third (1/3) of the purchase price directly to the surviving spouse or his or her agent or attorney at the time of the execution or delivery of the deed.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 143, §§ 1, 2; 1963, No. 68, § 1; 1981, No. 714, §§ 21, 22; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 61-204, 61-205.

28-11-305. Personalty.

If a person dies leaving a surviving spouse and a child or children, the surviving spouse shall be entitled, as part of dower or curtesy in his or her own right, to one-third (1/3) part of the personal estate whereof the deceased spouse died seized or possessed.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 20; C. & M. Dig., § 3535; Pope's Dig., § 4420; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-202.

28-11-306. Bonds, notes, accounts, and evidences of debt.

If any person shall die leaving a surviving spouse, the surviving spouse shall be allowed to take the same dower or curtesy in the bonds, bills, notes, books, accounts, and evidences of debt as the surviving spouse would be entitled to take out of the personal property or cash on hand of the deceased spouse.

History.

Acts 1859, No. 231, § 1, p. 299; 1867, No. 116, § 1, p. 277; C. & M. Dig., § 3535; Pope's Dig., § 4420; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-203.